Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 11. Personnel Rules

§ 1121.
Authority to adopt.

A municipality may adopt rules relating to personnel administration, including the following: job classification, tenure, retirement, pensions, leaves of absence, vacations, holidays, hours of work, group insurance, salaries, layoff, reinstatement, promotion, demotion, dismissal, transfer, injury, settlement of disputes, and appeals.

The personnel rules may apply to any or all employees of a municipality, including officers and employees of a fire department or police department maintained by the municipality. Rules adopted by the selectboard of a town under this subchapter shall not apply to employees of a town school district.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 2, 1970.

§ 1122.
Procedure for adoption.

Rules adopted under authority of this subchapter shall be deemed to be administrative and may be adopted by majority vote of the legislative body of a municipality.
Sections 1971-1975 of this title shall not apply to rules adopted under this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 2, 1970.